src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_aassad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - aassâđ: # MLO checked
    aassâđ+V+Inf: aassâđ
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aasâm
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aasah
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: áásá
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ässeen
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: asâvettee
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: aassâv
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aassâp
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: asâvetteđ
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ääsih # info: äässih NOT correct
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aassim
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aassih
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aasâi
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: aasáim
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: aasáid
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: aasáin
#    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: assáim # assáim etc in corpus, should be Err/Orth
#    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: assáid
#    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: assáin
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aasâim
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: aasâid
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: assii
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: asâččim
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: asâččih
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: asâččij
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: asâččáim
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: asâččáid
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: asâččáin
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: asâččijm
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: asâččijd
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: asâččii
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ässeem
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: ässeeh
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: aasâš
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: asâžeen
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: aasâšvettee
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: asâžává
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: asâžep
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: aasâšvetteđ
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: asâžeh
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: aasâ
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: áásus
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ássoon
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: ässee
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: áássus
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: áássup
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: aassâđ
    aassâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: áássus
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: aasâ
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: aassâm
    aassâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: asâččii
    aassâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: aasii
    aassâđ+V+PrsPrc: ässee
    aassâđ+V+PrfPrc: aassâm
    aassâđ+V+Actio+Nom: aassâm
    aassâđ+V+Actio+Ess: asâmin
    aassâđ+V+Actio+Loc: asâmist
    aassâđ+V+Actio+Ill: asâmân
    aassâđ+V+Ger: asâdijn
    aassâđ+V+VAbess: asâhánnáá


  Verb - veerrâđ: # generated from FST:
    veerrâđ+V+Inf: veerrâđ
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veerâm
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: veerah
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viärá
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: verreen
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: verâvettee
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: veerrâv
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: veerrâp
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: verâvetteđ
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: veerih
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: veerrim
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: veerrih
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: veerâi
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: veeráim # ML's mother produced this form
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: veeráid
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: veeráin
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: veerâim
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: veerâid
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: verrii
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: verâččim
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: verâččih
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: verâččij
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: verâččáim
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: verâččáid
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: verâččáin
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: verâččijm
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: verâččijd
    veerrâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: verâččii
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: verreem
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: verreeh
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: veerâš
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: verâžeen
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: veerâšvettee
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: verâžává
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: verâžep
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: veerâšvetteđ
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: verâžeh
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: veerâ
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: viärus
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: verree
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: viärrus
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: viärrup
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: veerrâđ
    veerrâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: viärrus
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: veerâ
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: veerrâm
    veerrâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: veerii
    veerrâđ+V+PrsPrc: verree
    veerrâđ+V+PrfPrc: veerrâm
    veerrâđ+V+Actio+Nom: veerrâm
    veerrâđ+V+Actio+Ess: verâmin
    veerrâđ+V+Actio+Loc: verâmist
    veerrâđ+V+Actio+Ill: verâmân

  Verb - caappâđ: # pp4 gradation
    caappâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: caaváim
    caappâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: caaváid
    caappâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: caaváin
